Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1067.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.5. Notice of Gift Card Scams.--(a) A retailer may not sell a gift card or gift certificate to a purchaser unless the retailer has displayed a notice:(1) warning the purchaser about prepaid gift card scams; and(2) instructing the purchaser on what to do if the purchaser suspects the purchaser might be a potential victim of a gift card scam, including contact information for the bureau or local law enforcement.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The retailer shall clearly and conspicuously post the notice required under subsection (a) at or near the following locations:(1) the physical location where gift cards or gift certificates are displayed for sale; and(2) all points of sale.(c) The bureau shall create a model notice that meets the requirements under subsection (a) and make the notice accessible to retailers on the bureau's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Retailers shall train all managers and employes engaged in the sale of gift cards or gift certificates on how to identify and respond to gift card fraud. The training shall include:(1) warning signs that a purchaser of a gift card is a victim of a gift card-related scam;(2) common types of scams involving gift cards;(3) communication methods for speaking with purchasers of gift cards who are exhibiting warning signs of being a victim of gift card scams;(4) to whom suspected gift card scams should be reported; and(5) retailer policies and procedures on handling suspected gift card scams.(e) The bureau shall develop and make available to retailers a model training program for identifying warning signs of gift card fraud.(f) (E) A retailer shall require any purchaser of a gift card or gift certificate to present a valid photo identification at the point of sale.20250HB1067PN1622 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) (F) This section shall be enforced as follows: (1) For a first violation, the bureau shall contact the retailer via certified mail and inform the retailer that corrective action is required to comply with this section.(2) Within thirty days of receipt of the letter, the retailer shall contact the bureau and document the corrective action taken to comply with this section.(3) If the retailer fails to timely contact the bureau or provide documentation of corrective action or does not comply with this section, the retailer commits a second violation and shall be subject to the penalties under paragraph (4).(4) A retailer that commits a second violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than five hundred dollars ($500).(5) A retailer that commits a third or subsequent violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(g) As used in this section:"Bureau" means the Bureau of Consumer Protection of the Office of Attorney General."Gift card" means a plastic card or other electronic payment device that is:(1) usable and honored upon presentation at a single merchant or an affiliated group of merchants that share the same name, mark or logo, or usable at multiple, unaffiliated merchants or service providers for the future purchase or delivery of any goods or services; and(2) issued in a specific prepaid amount regardless of whether it may be increased in value or reloaded."Gift certificate" means a promise written or printed on 20250HB1067PN1622 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paper or a paper product that is:(1) usable and honored upon presentation at a single merchant or an affiliated group of merchants that share the same name, mark or logo, or usable at multiple, unaffiliated merchants or service providers for the future purchase or delivery of any goods or services; and(2) issued in a specific prepaid amount regardless of whether it may be increased in value or reloaded."Retailer" means a place of business that displays or offers gift cards or gift certificates for sale to the public. This term does not include an establishment that sells gift cards or gift certificates that are valid only at the establishment."RETAILER" MEANS A PLACE OF BUSINESS THAT DISPLAYS OR OFFERS GIFT CARDS OR GIFT CERTIFICATES FOR SALE TO THE PUBLIC. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PLACE OF BUSINESS THAT SELLS GIFT CARDS OR GIFT CERTIFICATES THAT ARE VALID ONLY FOR A MERCHANT OR GROUP OF MERCHANTS AFFILIATED WITH THAT PLACE OF BUSINESS, WHICH ARE CLASSIFIED UNDER THE ARTS, ENTERTAINMENT, AND RECREATION (NAICS SECTOR 71) OR ACCOMMODATION AND FOOD SERVICES (NAICS SECTOR 72) ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1067PN1622 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021